Virginia statutes. Title 17.1. Courts of Record.
Article 4.1. Electronic Filing.

§ 17.1-258.2.
Definition.

As used in this article,
“electronic filing of documents”
means the filing or recordation with a circuit court clerk of written information as defined in §

1-257

, for the purpose of creating an electronic record as defined in subdivision 7 of § 59.1-480.

History.

2005, c. 744.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 744, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of §§

17.1-258.2

through

17.1-258.5

, 55-108 and 55-142.13 shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Clerk of court can close the office when a county has failed to adopt a budget. —

Clerk of court can close the office when a county has failed to adopt a budget and the clerk cannot pay his employees. A clerk, or the employees of the clerk’s office, can serve on a volunteer basis until the budget impasse is resolved. To the extent particular functions, including electronic filing procedures, can be kept operational in the absence of funding from the county and without staffing, the clerk should do so. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Jack Kennedy, Clerk of the Circuit Court, Wise County and City of Norton, 11-063, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 34 (6/22/11).

§ 17.1-258.3.
Electronic filing in civil or criminal proceedings.

Any clerk of circuit court may establish and operate a system for electronic filing in civil or criminal proceedings that shall be governed by the Rules of Supreme Court of Virginia. The circuit court clerk may require each person whom the clerk authorizes to file documents electronically to provide proof of identity to the clerk and to enter into an agreement specifying the electronic filing procedures to be followed, including, but not limited to, security procedures, as defined in the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act (§ 59.1-479 et seq.), for transmitting signed or notarized documents. The clerk may charge copy fees per page, as provided in subdivision A 8 of §

17.1-275

, and obtain reimbursement for fees paid by subscribers to its designated application service providers for the technology systems used to operate electronic filing in civil and criminal cases in the clerk’s office. The fees and reimbursements collected shall be deposited by the clerk into the clerk’s nonreverting local fund to be used to cover operational expenses as defined in §

17.1-295

. Nothing herein shall be construed to prevent the clerk from entering into agreements with designated application service providers to provide all or part of the network or system for electronic filing of civil or criminal records as provided herein. Further, nothing herein shall be construed to require the electronic filing of any civil or criminal record, and such records may continue to be filed in paper form.

Any clerk of circuit court with an electronic filing system established in accordance with the Rules of Supreme Court of Virginia may charge an additional $5 fee for every civil case initially filed by paper, except that a person who is determined to be indigent pursuant to §

19.2-159

shall be exempt from the payment of such fee. The fee shall be paid to the clerk’s office and deposited by the clerk into the clerk’s nonreverting local fund to be exclusively used to cover the operational expenses as defined in §

17.1-295

.

History.

2005, c. 744; 2008, cc. 823, 833; 2010, cc. 430, 717, 760; 2013, cc. 74, 77; 2014, c. 460; 2015, c. 317.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 744, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of §§

17.1-258.2

through

17.1-258.5

, 55-108 and 55-142.13 shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 823 and 833 are identical, and deleted “or recordation of documents pursuant to the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act (§ 59.1-479 et seq.). Once established, any person, as defined in subdivision 11 of § 59.1-480, may electronically file land records, instruments, judgments, and UCC financing statements. Electronic filing of papers” following “electronic filing” and inserted “that” following “criminal actions” in the first sentence.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by cc. 430, 717 and 760 are nearly identical, and substituted “any clerk” for “a clerk,” “proceedings” for “actions,” “the Rules of the Supreme Court” for “Rule 1.17 of the Rules of Supreme Court,” “may require” for “shall enter into an agreement with” and inserted “to enter into an agreement,” “(§ 59.1-479 et seq.),” and “signed or.” The section has been set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 74 added the second paragraph.

The 2013 amendment by c. 77 inserted “to provide proof of identity to the clerk and” in the second sentence and added the third through sixth sentences in the first paragraph.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 460 at the end of the second paragraph substituted “as defined in §

17.1-295

” for “of the electronic filing system.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 317 substituted “Rules of Supreme Court” for “Rules of the Supreme Court” in the first sentence of the first and second paragraphs and substituted “$5 fee” for “$2 fee” in the second paragraph.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Discretion of clerk. —

Absent an explicit statutory scheme outlining the procedures required for electronic filing of documents or a legislative enactment to the contrary, it is within the discretion of a clerk of the circuit court to establish such procedures, including the decision regarding the persons with whom he must enter into agreements for such filings. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Paul M. Metzger, Spotsylvania County Circuit Court Clerk, 05-086 (3/27/06).

§ 17.1-258.3:1.
Electronic filing of land records; paper form.

A clerk of a circuit court may provide a network or system for electronic filing of land records in accordance with the provisions of Article 3 (§

55.1-346

et seq.) of Chapter 3 of Title 55.1 regarding the satisfaction of mortgages and the Uniform Real Property Electronic Recording Act (§

55.1-661

et seq.). The clerk may require each filer to provide proof of identity to the clerk. The clerk shall enter into an electronic filing agreement with each filer in accordance with Virginia Real Property Electronic Recording Standards established by the Virginia Information Technologies Agency. Nothing herein shall be construed to prevent the clerk from entering into agreements with designated application service providers to provide all or part of the network or system for electronic filing of land records as provided herein. Further, nothing herein shall be construed to require the electronic filing of any land record, and such records may continue to be filed in paper form.

Any clerk of a circuit court with an electronic filing system established in accordance with this section may charge a fee not to exceed $5 per instrument for every land record filed by paper. The fee shall be paid to the clerk’s office and deposited by the clerk into the clerk’s nonreverting local fund to be used exclusively to cover the operational expenses as defined in §

17.1-295

.

The clerk shall maintain a disaster plan, as defined in §

42.1-77

, for recovery of any land record in possession of the clerk that is maintained as an electronic record.

History.

2008, cc. 823, 833; 2010, c. 430; 2012, c. 234; 2013, c. 77; 2016, c. 264; 2017, cc. 90, 289.

Editor’s note.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “the provisions of Article 3 (§

55.1-346

et seq.) of Chapter 3 of Title 55.1 regarding the satisfaction of mortgages and the Uniform Real Property Electronic Recording Act (§

55.1-661

et seq.)” for “the Uniform Real Property Electronic Recording Act (§ 55-142.10 et seq.) and the provisions of Article 2.1 (§ 55-66.8 et seq.) of Chapter 4 of Title 55.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 430, in the third sentence, substituted “the clerk’s” for “a special”
and deleted “of such network or system” from the end; in the fourth sentence, deleted “of such network or system” preceding “shall include” and added clauses (i) through (iii).

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 234 inserted “including locating technology in an offsite facility for such purposes or for the implementation of a disaster recovery plan” in clause (iii).

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 77 substituted “as defined in §

17.1-295

” at the end of the third sentence for the former fourth sentence, which defined “operational expenses”; and inserted the fourth and seventh sentences.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 264, effective July 1, 2017, added subsection B.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 90 and 289 are identical, and deleted the former second and third sentences in subsection A which read “The clerk may charge a fee to be assessed for each instrument recorded electronically in an amount not to exceed $5 per document. The fee shall be paid to the clerk’s office and deposited by the clerk into the clerk’s nonreverting local fund to be used to cover operational expenses as defined in §

17.1-295

”; inserted subsection B, and redesignated former subsection B as subsection C.

§ 17.1-258.3:2.
Official certificates and certified records in digital form.

A clerk of circuit court may establish a system for providing official certificates and certified records in digital form of any document maintained by the clerk. The clerk may require any person to provide proof of identity to the clerk in order to obtain access to such records. The clerk or his designated application service provider may assess an additional fee not to exceed $5 per official certificate accompanying or attesting the certified records, subject to subdivision A 8 of §

17.1-275

and to the exemptions provided in §

17.1-267

. The clerk may perform such other notarial acts as allowed under §

47.1-12

. The fee shall be paid to the clerk’s office and deposited by the clerk into the clerk’s nonreverting local fund to be used to cover operational expenses as defined in §

17.1-295

. Nothing herein shall be construed to require any person to obtain an electronic certificate of any record maintained by the clerk, and such record may continue to be obtained in paper form. The clerk of the circuit court of any jurisdiction shall be immune from suit arising from any acts or omissions relating to providing official certificates and certified records in digital form of any document maintained by the clerk pursuant to this section unless the clerk was grossly negligent or engaged in willful misconduct.

History.

2010, c. 430; 2011, c. 715; 2013, c. 77.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 715 added the third and last sentences.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 77 inserted the second sentence; substituted “as defined in §

17.1-295

” at the end of the fifth sentence for the former fifth sentence, which defined “operational expenses”; and inserted the sixth sentence.

§ 17.1-258.3:3.
Submission of records as electronic documents.

Upon written agreement with the clerk, any agency or instrumentality of the Commonwealth may submit any record to the clerk as an electronic document. The form of electronic submission shall comply with the security and data standards established by the Virginia Information Technologies Agency for any such electronic submission. Any record so submitted shall satisfy any law requiring that a document be an original, be on paper or another tangible medium, or be in writing.

History.

2015, c. 641.

§ 17.1-258.4.
Signature; when effective as original; notarization; seal.

If the electronically filed document contains an electronic signature pursuant to the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act (§ 59.1-479 et seq.) that is capable of independent verification and renders any subsequent changes or modifications to the electronic document evident, any statutory requirement for original signature shall be deemed to be satisfied.

Any statutory requirement for a document to be notarized shall be deemed satisfied by the appropriately executed electronic signature of such notary pursuant to the Virginia Notary Act (§

47.1-1

et seq.).

When a seal or stamp is required to be affixed by any court or clerk on a document, the attachment of an official electronic seal or official electronic stamp to the electronic document is sufficient. “Official electronic seal” and “official electronic stamp” mean an electronic image of a seal or stamp, respectively, of the court or clerk, that is produced by software applications authorized by the clerk that are protected by system credentials to which only the clerk or persons authorized by the clerk have access.

History.

2005, c. 744; 2008, cc. 823, 833; 2010, cc. 717, 760; 2013, c. 77.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 744, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of §§

17.1-258.2

through

17.1-258.5

, 55-108 and 55-142.13 shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 823 and 833 are identical, and added “pursuant to the Virginia Notary Act (§

47.1-1

et seq.)” to the end of subsection B.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 717 and 760 are identical, and added subsection C.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 77 inserted “that is capable of independent verification and renders any subsequent changes or modifications to the electronic document evident” in subsection A.

Law Review.

For article, “Civil Practice and Procedure,” see 45 U. Rich. L. Rev. 183 (2010).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Electronic notarization. —

Prior to July 1, 2008, an electronic notarization of a document by a Virginia notary public constituted a valid notarial act so long as the act was performed by a valid and commissioned notary public who complied with applicable laws and regulations. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable John T. Frey, Clerk of the Circuit Court for Fairfax County, 08-089, 2009 Va. AG LEXIS 8 (2/2/09).

§ 17.1-258.5.
Application.

All documents recorded on or after July 1, 2004 that comply with the provisions of this article shall be conclusively presumed to be in proper form for recording, except in cases of fraud.

History.

2005, c. 744.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 744, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of §§

17.1-258.2

through

17.1-258.5

, 55-108 and 55-142.13 shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

§ 17.1-258.6.
Acceptability of electronic medium; submission of trial court record to appellate court.

In connection with civil or criminal proceedings in circuit court, any statutory requirement for an original, original paper, paper, record, document, facsimile, memorandum, exhibit, certification, or transcript shall be satisfied if such is in an electronic form approved for filing under the Rules of Supreme Court of Virginia. However, this section shall not apply to documents the form of which is specified in any statute governing the creation and execution of wills, codicils, testamentary trusts, premarital agreements, and negotiable instruments.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any statutory authorization for the use of copies or reproductions in civil or criminal proceedings in circuit court shall be satisfied by use of such copies or reproductions in hard copy or electronic form approved for filing under the Rules of Supreme Court of Virginia.

Any clerk of a circuit court with an electronic filing system that complies with the Rules of Supreme Court of Virginia may provide the trial court record in electronic form to the appropriate clerk of any appellate court. The clerk of the Supreme Court and the clerk of the Court of Appeals shall accept the official civil or criminal record in electronic form as otherwise required by law. The clerk in the appellate court may also request that any paper trial court records be forwarded to such clerk.

The Rules of Supreme Court of Virginia shall not prohibit the use of a private vendor electronic filing system if such system is in compliance with the filing standards established by the Court.

History.

2010, cc. 717, 760; 2015, c. 71; 2018, cc. 125, 129, 523.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 71, effective January 1, 2016, deleted “the” preceding “Supreme Court” in subsections A and B and added subsections C and D.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 125 and 129 are identical, and substituted “civil or criminal proceedings” for “civil proceedings” in subsections A and B.

The 2018 amendment by c. 523 added the last sentence in subsection C.